Connecticut, session 2026, SB00250.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Secretary of the Office of Policy
2 and Management shall conduct a study of the response times of state
3 agencies to requests for public records made under the Freedom of
4 Information Act, as defined in section 1-200 of the general statutes. Not
5 later than January 15, 2027, the secretary shall submit a report of the
6 findings of such study, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-
7 4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General
8 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to government
9 oversight. Such report shall include a summary of average state agency
10 response times, information about when unreasonable response times
11 were the basis of a complaint filed with the Freedom of Information
12 Commission and any recommendations for legislation to address any
13 findings of such study.
SB250 / File No. 289 1

SB250 File No. 289
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
GOS Joint Favorable
SB250 / File No. 289 2

SB250 File No. 289
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Policy & Mgmt., Off. GF - Cost Up to None
$300,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Office of Policy and Management (OPM) to
conduct a study on the response times of state agencies to Freedom of
Information Act (FOIA) requests and submit a report by January 15,
2027. This results in a one-time cost to OPM of up to $300,000 in FY 27
for a consultant to meet these requirements and complete a report
within the time frame.
The consultant will be responsible for developing a mechanism to
gather, organize, and report on this information. The cost is partly
dependent on the number of complaints regarding FOIA requests.1
The Out Years
None.
1 In 2024 there were approximately 855 complaints.
SB250 / File No. 289 3

SB250 File No. 289
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 250
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF STATE AGENCY RESPONSE
TIMES TO FREEDOM OF INFORMATION ACT REQUESTS.